District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.134

Creation of the Southwest Waterfront PILOT/TIF Area.

(a)

There is created the Southwest Waterfront PILOT/TIF Area, the Available Sales Tax Revenues from which shall be allocated as provided in this subchapter.

(b)

Beginning on the Commencement Date, the Available Sales Tax Revenues from the Southwest Waterfront PILOT/TIF Area shall be allocated and paid into the Southwest Waterfront Fund and used for any of the purposes described in § 2-1217.133. The termination date for the allocation of Available Sales Tax Revenues shall be the earlier of:

(1)

September 30, 2044; or

(2)

The day after all of the bonds are paid or provided for and are no longer outstanding pursuant to their terms.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-252, § 104, 55 DCR 9251